District of Columbia statutes.
7-2504.01

Manufacture of firearms, destructive devices or ammunition prohibited; requirement for dealer’s license.

(a)

No person or organization shall manufacture any firearm, destructive device or parts thereof, or ammunition, within the District; provided, that persons holding registration certificates may engage in hand loading, reloading, or custom loading ammunition for his registered firearms; provided further, that such person may not hand load, reload, or custom load ammunition for others.

(b)

No person or organization shall engage in the business of selling, purchasing, or repairing any firearm, destructive device, parts therefor, or ammunition, without first obtaining a dealer’s license, and no licensee shall engage in the business of selling, purchasing, or repairing firearms which are unregisterable under § 7-2502.02, destructive devices, or parts therefor, except pursuant to a valid work or purchase order, for those persons specified in § 7-2502.01(b)(1).

(c)

Any license issued pursuant to this section shall be issued by the Metropolitan Police Department as a Public Safety endorsement to a basic business license under the basic business license system as set forth in subchapter I-A of Chapter 28 of Title 47.

History

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title IV, § 401, 23 DCR 2464
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(k)(1), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 3(i)(1), 50 DCR 6913

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-2508.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2341.
1973 Ed., § 6-1841.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-38, in subsec. (c), substituted “Public Safety endorsement to a basic business license under the basic” for “Class A Public Safety endorsement to a master business license under the master”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(i)(1) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).